Hawaii statutes.
PART I.
GENERAL PROVISIONS

[§657D-1] Definitions. As used in this
chapter, unless the context indicates otherwise:

"Active service" or "active
duty" includes but is not limited to the period during which the persons
in military service are absent from duty on account of sickness, wounds, leave,
or other lawful cause.

"Court" includes any court of
competent jurisdiction of the State of Hawaii, whether or not a court of
record.

"Military service" means service on
state active duty in any of the state military forces.

"Period of military service" means
the period beginning on the date on which the person enters state active duty
and ending on the date of the person's release from state active duty or death
while on state active duty.

"Person", when used with reference to
the holder of any right alleged to exist against a person in military service
or against a person secondarily liable under such right, includes individuals,
partnerships, corporations, and any other forms of business association.

"Person in the military service" and
"persons in the military service of the State" include all members of
any of the state military forces, as defined in section 124A-1.

"State active duty" includes any
period during which a person in the military service of the State is ordered to
state active duty by the adjutant general or the governor. [L 1994, c 257, pt
of §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next